Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 3. Packages and Labeling

§ 2671.
Method of sale of commodities; general.

Commodities in liquid form shall be sold only by liquid measure or by weight, and, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, commodities not in liquid form shall be sold only by weight, by measure of length or area, or by count. However, liquid commodities may be sold by weight and commodities not in liquid form may be sold by count only if such methods give accurate information as to the quantity of commodity sold. The provisions of this section shall not apply (1) to commodities when sold for immediate consumption on the premises where sold, (2) to vegetables when sold by the head or bunch, (3) to commodities in containers standardized by a law of this State or by federal law, (4) to commodities in package form when there exists a general consumer usage to express the quantity in some other manner, (5) to concrete aggregates, concrete mixtures, and loose solid materials such as earth, soil, gravel, crushed stone, and the like, when sold by cubic measure, or (6) to unprocessed vegetable and animal fertilizer when sold by cubic measure. The Secretary may issue such reasonable regulations as are necessary to ensure that amounts of commodity sold are determined in accordance with good commercial practice and are so determined and represented as to be accurate and informative to all parties at interest.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 18, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2672.
Packages, declarations of quantity and origin; variations; exemptions.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any commodity in package form introduced or delivered for introduction into or received in intrastate commerce, kept for the purpose of sale, or offered or exposed for sale in intrastate commerce, shall bear on the outside of the package such definite, plain, and conspicuous declarations of:

the identity of the commodity in the package unless the same can easily be identified through the wrapper or container;

the net quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or count; and

in the case of any package kept, offered, or exposed for sale, or sold any place other than on the premises where packed, the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor as may be prescribed by regulation issued by the Secretary.

In connection with the declaration required under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, neither the qualifying term “when packed” or any words of similar import, nor any term qualifying a unit of weight, measure, or count, for example, “jumbo,” “giant,” “full,” and the like, that tends to exaggerate the amount of commodity in a package, may be used. Under subdivision (a)(2) of this section the Secretary may, by regulation, establish: reasonable variations to be allowed, which may include variations below the declared weight or measure caused by ordinary and customary exposure, only after the commodity is introduced into intrastate commerce, to conditions that normally occur in good distribution practice and that unavoidably result in decreased weight or measure; exemptions as to small packages; and exemptions as to commodities put up in variable weights or sizes for sale intact and either customarily not sold as individual units or customarily weighed or measured at time of sale to the consumer.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 19, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2673.
Declarations of unit price on random packages.

In addition to the declarations required by section 2672 of this title, any commodity in package form, the package being one of a lot containing random weights, measures, or counts of the same commodity and bearing the total selling price of the package, shall bear on the outside of the package a plain and conspicuous declaration of the price per single unit of weight, measure, or count.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 20, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2674.
Misleading packages.

No commodity in package form may be so wrapped, nor may it be in a container so made, formed, or filled as to mislead the purchaser as to the quantity of the contents of the package, and the contents of a container shall not fall below such reasonable standard or fill as may have been prescribed for the commodity in question by the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 21, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2675.
Advertising packages for sale.

Whenever a commodity in package form is advertised in any manner and the retail price of the package is stated in the advertisement, there shall be closely and conspicuously associated with that statement of price a declaration of the basic quantity of contents of the package as is required by law or regulation to appear on the package.
When fruit packaged, graded by the packer, and sold by count is advertised, the advertisement must state the size.
In connection with the declaration required under this section, there shall be declared neither the qualifying term “when packed” nor any other words of similar import, nor any term qualifying a unit of weight, measure, or count, for example, “jumbo,” “giant,” “full,” and the like, that tends to exaggerate the amount of commodity in the package.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 22, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1971, No. 69

, § 6, eff. April 15, 1971.

§ 2676.
Sale by net weight.

The word “weight” as used in this chapter in connection with any commodity shall mean net weight.
Whenever any commodity is sold on the basis of weight, the net weight of the commodity shall be employed, and all contracts concerning commodities shall be so construed.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 23, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2677.
Misrepresentation of price.

Whenever any commodity or service is sold, or is offered, exposed, or advertised for sale, by weight, measure, or count, the price shall not be misrepresented, nor shall the price be represented in any manner calculated or tending to mislead or deceive an actual or prospective purchaser.
Whenever an advertised, posted, or labeled price per unit of weight, measure, or count includes a fraction of a cent, all elements of the fraction or decimal shall be prominently displayed and the numeral or numerals expressing the fraction or decimal shall be immediately adjacent to, of the same general design and style as, and at least 40 percent the height and width of, the numerals representing the whole cents.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 24, eff. April 14, 1967.